District of Columbia statutes.
2-1507

Accounting and voucher systems.

The Mayor shall instruct the Office of Budget and Resource Development to coordinate with the Department of Recreation the establishment of a bookkeeping and accounting system to allow for timely allocation of monies from the District of Columbia government to neighborhood planning council programs, and shall establish a regular voucher system to facilitate the swift transference of funds from the District of Columbia government to the neighborhood planning councils.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-93, § 8, 23 DCR 9532b
1981 Ed., § 1-2607.
1973 Ed., § 6-2007.
Pursuant to Mayor’s Order 2000-20, the agency formerly known as the “Department of Recreation” renamed the “Department of Recreation and Parks” shall be known as the “Department of Parks and Recreation.”